Utah statutes.
26-18-303.   Content of applications.
Applications for grants under this chapter shall include:
(1)  a statement of specific, measurable objectives, and the methods to be
used to assess the achievement of those objectives;
(2)  the precise boundaries of the area to be served by the entity making the
application, including a description of the medically underserved population
to be served by the grant;
(3)  the results of an assessment of need demonstrating that the population to
be served has a need for the services provided by the applicant;
(4)  a description of the personnel responsible for carrying out the
activities of the grant along with a statement justifying the use of any grant
funds for the personnel;
(5)  letters and other forms of evidence showing that efforts have been made
to secure financial and professional assistance and support for the services
to be provided under the grant;
(6)  a list of services to be provided by the applicant;
(7)  the schedule of fees to be charged by the applicant;
(8)  the estimated number of medically underserved persons to be served with
the grant award; and
(9)  other provisions as determined by the department.
